v1.1/old/guesser.lexc
-~fmiigh[N→V]:~fmiigh                    VerbIntr5; ! to hold in one's N; to put in one's N
-~fmiigh[N→V]:~fmiigh                    VerbTrns5; ! to hold in one's N; to put in one's N
-–msuggiite[N→V]:–msuggiite              VerbIntr5; ! to completely lack N
-–msuggiite[N→V]:–msuggiite              VerbTrns5; ! to completely lack N
-–nge[N→V]:–nge                          VerbIntr5; ! to acquire N; to get N (permanently); to obtain N (permanently); to catch N (game)
-–nge[N→V]:–nge                          VerbTrns5; ! to acquire N; to get N (permanently); to obtain N (permanently); to catch N (game)
-~%:(ng₁)igh[N→V]:~:(ng₁)igh             VerbIntr5; ! to lose N; to be injured in one's N; to remove N
-~%:(ng₁)igh[N→V]:~:(ng₁)igh             VerbTrns5; ! to lose N; to be injured in one's N; to remove N
-~%:(ng₁)isag[N→V]:~:(ng₁)isag           VerbIntr5; ! to lack N; to need N
-~%:(ng₁)isag[N→V]:~:(ng₁)isag           VerbTrns5; ! to lack N; to need N
-~%:(ng₁)isug[N→V]:~%:(ng₁)isug          VerbIntr5; ! to have insufficient N
-~%:(ng₁)isug[N→V]:~%:(ng₁)isug          VerbTrns5; ! to have insufficient N
-~%:(ng₁)ite**[N→V]:~%:(ng₁)ite**        VerbIntr5; ! to lack N; to not have N
-~%:(ng₁)ite**[N→V]:~%:(ng₁)ite**        VerbTrns5; ! to lack N; to not have N
-–ngllagh[N→V]:–ngllagh                  VerbIntr5; ! to make N (for (him) or out of (it))
-–ngllagh[N→V]:–ngllagh                  VerbTrns5; ! to make N (for (him) or out of (it))
-~%:(ng₁)u[N→V]:~%:(ng₁)u                VerbIntr5; ! to be N; is N; for there to be N (weather condition);
-~%:(ng₁)u[N→V]:~%:(ng₁)u                VerbTrns5; ! to be N; is N; for there to be N (weather condition);
-~%:(ng₁)ughte[N→V]:~%:(ng₁)ughte        VerbIntr5; ! to become N; for there to start to be N (weather condition)
-~%:(ng₁)ughte[N→V]:~%:(ng₁)ughte        VerbTrns5; ! to become N; for there to start to be N (weather condition)
-@₁~fniigh[N→V]:@₁~fniigh                VerbIntr5; ! to hunt for N; to search for N; to ask for N; to endeavor or to obtain N
-@₁~fniigh[N→V]:@₁~fniigh                VerbTrns5; ! to hunt for N; to search for N; to ask for N; to endeavor or to obtain N
-nite[N→V]:nite                          VerbIntr5; ! to taste of N
-nite[N→V]:nite                          VerbTrns5; ! to taste of N
-–pagite[N→V]:–pagite                    VerbIntr5; ! for there not to be much N; to have few N
-–pagite[N→V]:–pagite                    VerbTrns5; ! for there not to be much N; to have few N
-pagnite[N→V]:pagnite                    VerbIntr5; ! to smell like N; to taste like N
-pagnite[N→V]:pagnite                    VerbTrns5; ! to smell like N; to taste like N
-–pigu[N→V]:–pigu                        VerbIntr5; ! to be very much an N
-–pigu[N→V]:–pigu                        VerbTrns5; ! to be very much an N
-~–qite[N→V]:~–qite                      VerbIntr5; ! to encounter N
-~–qite[N→V]:~–qite                      VerbTrns5; ! to encounter N
-qu[N→V]:qu                              VerbIntr5; ! to hunt N; to hunt with (using) N
-qu[N→V]:qu                              VerbTrns5; ! to hunt N; to hunt with (using) N
-@₁~f–rakegte[N→V]:@₁~f–rakegte          VerbIntr5; ! to be very much an N
-@₁~f–rakegte[N→V]:@₁~f–rakegte          VerbTrns5; ! to be very much an N
-saghtugh[N→V]:saghtugh                  VerbIntr5; ! to hunt N
-saghtugh[N→V]:saghtugh                  VerbTrns5; ! to hunt N
-si[N→V]:si                              VerbIntr5; ! to work on or with N; to acquire lots of N; to get lots of N
-si[N→V]:si                              VerbTrns5; ! to work on or with N; to acquire lots of N; to get lots of N
-siigh[N→V]:siigh                        VerbIntr5; ! to get lots of N; to gather lots of N 
-siigh[N→V]:siigh                        VerbTrns5; ! to get lots of N; to gather lots of N
-sugnite[N→V]:sugnite                    VerbIntr5; ! to resemble N; to be like N
-sugnite[N→V]:sugnite                    VerbTrns5; ! to resemble N; to be like N
-tagh[N→V]:tagh                          VerbIntr5; ! for N to continously occur; for N to repeatedly occur 
-tagh[N→V]:tagh                          VerbTrns5; ! for N to continously occur; for N to repeatedly occur
-te[N→V]:te                              VerbIntr5; ! to go to N; to catch N; to obtain N; to spend N (time)
-te[N→V]:te                              VerbTrns5; ! to go to N; to catch N; to obtain N; to spend N (time)
-ti[N→V]:ti                              VerbIntr5; ! to speak the language of N
-ti[N→V]:ti                              VerbTrns5; ! to speak the language of N
-tu[N→V]:tu                              VerbIntr5; ! to have a lot of N 
-tu[N→V]:tu                              VerbTrns5; ! to have a lot of N 
-–tu[N→V]:–tu                            VerbIntr5; ! to have a lot of N
-–tu[N→V]:–tu                            VerbTrns5; ! to have a lot of N
-tugh[N→V]:tugh                          VerbIntr5; ! to eat N
-tugh[N→V]:tugh                          VerbTrns5; ! to eat N
-tulli[N→V]:tulli                        VerbIntr5; ! for it to be getting feasible to use N 
-tulli[N→V]:tulli                        VerbTrns5; ! for it to be getting feasible to use N
-tuumagh*[N→V]:tuumagh*                  QuantQualPostbase; ! together with one's N(s)
-tupag[N→V]:tupag                        VerbIntr5; ! to eat or use too much N
-tupag[N→V]:tupag                        VerbTrns5; ! to eat or use too much N
-tutka[N→V]:tutka                        VerbIntr5; ! to have N to an indicated degree
-tutka[N→V]:tutka                        VerbTrns5; ! to have N to an indicated degree
-uute[N→V]:uute                          VerbIntr5; ! to make the N sound 
-uute[N→V]:uute                          VerbTrns5; ! to make the N sound
-yag[N→V]:yag                            VerbIntr5; ! for the number of N to increase
-yag[N→V]:yag                            VerbTrns5; ! for the number of N to increase
-@₁~fyagh[N→V]:@₁~fyagh                  VerbIntr5; ! to go to celebrate N; to hunt N
-@₁~fyagh[N→V]:@₁~fyagh                  VerbTrns5; ! to go to celebrate N; to hunt N
-@₁~fyug[N→V]:@₁~fyug                    VerbIntr5; ! to want some N
-@₁~fyug[N→V]:@₁~fyug                    VerbTrns5; ! to want some N

-tuqagh[AUG]:tuqagh  EncliticOrEnd;
-tuqaat[AUG]:tuqaat  EncliticOrEnd;
-tuqaak[AUG]:tuqaak  EncliticOrEnd;
-–lgu[AUG]:–lgu      EncliticOrEnd;
-–lget[AUG]:–lget    EncliticOrEnd;
-–lgek[AUG]:–lgek    EncliticOrEnd;


!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!
!!!                        !!!
!!!     NounPostbase 5     !!!
!!!                        !!!
!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!
